Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1213.02
Network of regional officials
for death investigation support services.

The council shall also:

(1) Help establish
a voluntary network of regional officials including, but not limited to, law
enforcement, county coroners, and medical personnel to provide death investigation
support services for any location in Nebraska;

(2) Help determine the
membership of such networks; and

(3) Develop, design, and provide standardized
forms in both hard copy and electronic copy for use in death investigations.

Laws 2009, LB671, § 4.